Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6104
Registration; requirements.

To be a registered interior designer, an individual shall:

(1) Apply to the State Treasurer in a form and manner prescribed by the State Treasurer;

(2) Pay an application fee of not more than fifty dollars as determined by the State Treasurer; and

(3) Satisfy the requirements for placement on the registry as provided in section 71-6105.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 17.